Illinois, session 104th, SB749.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Health Care Worker Background Check Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 46/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Health Care Worker Background Check Act.9(Source: P.A. 89-197, eff. 7-21-95.)